Utah statutes.
41-6a-310.   Private vehicle as emergency vehicle -- Rules.

(1)  The commissioner of the Department of Public Safety may make rules, consistent with this chapter, governing the use, in emergencies, of signal lights on privately owned vehicles.

(2)  The rules under Subsection (1) may authorize a privately owned vehicle to be designated for part-time emergency use.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

